Hawaii statutes.
[§184-5.1] Arrest. Except when
authorized by law to immediately take a person arrested for violation of the
state parks, historical objects and sites, and outdoor recreation laws and
regulations; traffic laws and ordinances; and the laws of the State and the
rules and regulations of the department relative to the protection and proper
utilization of the recreational, scenic, historical, natural and
archaeological, scientific and related resources of state and private lands
before a magistrate, any state parks enforcement officer upon arresting any
person for violation of the state parks, historical objects and sites, and
outdoor recreation laws and regulations; traffic laws and ordinances; and laws
of the State and the rules and regulations of the department relative to the
protection and proper utilization of the recreational, scenic, historical,
natural and archaeological, scientific and related resources of state and
private lands shall take the name, address, social security number and other
pertinent information of the person and shall issue to the person a summons and
citation, printed in the form hereinafter described, mandating warning the
person to appear and answer to the charge against the person at a certain place
and at a time within seven days after the arrest. [L 1974, c 245, pt of §2; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next